Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201648-655
Combined taxes; payments in lieu of
contributions; collections; setoffs; interest; actions; setoff against
federal income tax refund; procedure.

(1) Combined taxes
or payments in lieu of contributions unpaid on the date on which they are
due and payable, as prescribed by the commissioner, shall bear interest at
the rate of one and one-half percent per month from such date until payment,
plus accrued interest, is received by the commissioner, except that no interest
shall be charged subsequent to the date of the erroneous payment of an amount
equal to the amount of the delayed payment into the unemployment trust fund
of another state or to the federal government. Interest collected pursuant
to this section shall be paid in accordance with subdivision (1)(b) of section
48-621. If, after due notice, any employer defaults in any payment of combined
taxes or payments in lieu of contributions or interest thereon, the amount
due may be collected (a) by civil action in the name of the commissioner and
the employer adjudged in default shall pay the costs of such action, (b) by setoff against any state income tax
refund due the employer pursuant to sections 77-27,197 to 77-27,209, or (c) as provided in subsection (2)
of this section. Civil actions brought under this section to collect
combined taxes or interest thereon or payments in lieu of contributions or
interest thereon from an employer shall be heard by the court at the earliest
possible date and shall be entitled to preference upon the calendar of the
court over all other civil actions except petitions for judicial review under
section 48-638.

(2) The commissioner
may recover a covered unemployment compensation debt, as defined in 26 U.S.C.
6402, by setoff against a person's federal income tax refund. Such setoff
shall be made in accordance with such section and United States Treasury regulations
and guidelines adopted pursuant thereto. The commissioner shall notify the
debtor that the commissioner plans to recover the debt through setoff against
any federal income tax refund, and the debtor shall be given sixty days to
present evidence that all or part of the liability is either not legally enforceable
or is not a covered unemployment compensation debt. The commissioner shall
review any evidence presented and determine that the debt is legally enforceable
and is a covered unemployment compensation debt before proceeding further
with the offset. The amount recovered, less any administrative fees charged
by the United States Treasury, shall be credited to the debt owed. Any determination
rendered under this subsection that the person's federal income tax refund
is not subject to setoff does not require the commissioner to amend the commissioner's
initial determination that formed the basis for the proposed setoff.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 14, p. 398;

Laws 1939, c. 56, § 11, p. 249;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-713;

R.S.1943, § 48-655;

Laws 1947, c. 175, § 14, p. 582;

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 14(1), p. 429;

Laws 1971, LB 651, § 10;

Laws 1985, LB 337, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 137;

Laws 1993, LB 46, § 14;

Laws 1994, LB 1337, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 1, § 13;

Laws 2000, LB 953, § 10;

Laws 2009, LB631, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB1058, § 8.